Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1080
Temporary injunction; modification; dissolution; supersedeas bond; effect.

Such supersedeas bond shall stay the doing of the act or acts sought to be restrained by the suit, and continue such injunction in force until the case is heard and finally determined by the judgment, decree or final order of the court in term time.

Laws 1889, c. 27, § 3, p. 374;

R.S.1913, § 7809;

C.S.1922, § 8753;

C.S.1929, § 20-1080;

R.S.1943, § 25-1080.